Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,158.02
Mobile nail technology salon license; application.

Any person seeking a license to operate a mobile nail technology salon shall submit a completed application to the department, and along with the application, the applicant shall submit a detailed floor plan or blueprint of the proposed salon sufficient to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of section 38-10,158.01.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 59.